Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-13] Department director; powers.
The department director has the power reasonably necessary to perform the
duties required of the department director's office by this chapter. The
department director shall adopt necessary rules pursuant to chapter 91. [L
2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next